Alabama, session 2026rs, SB189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
21 Section 1. Sections 32-6-62 and 32-6-64, Code of
22 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
23 "§32-6-62
24 (a) Subject to subsection (b), all motor vehicle
25 license plate designs shall be valid for not less than five10
26 years. The Commissioner of Revenue, with the approval of the
27 License Plates Legislative Oversight Committee established by
28 Section 32-6-67, may authorize a license plate design to be
Page 1

Section 32-6-67, may authorize a license plate design to be
SB189 INTRODUCED
29 valid for more than five10 years.
30 (b) Subsection (a) shall not affect any law which
31 designates a license plate design to be permanent."
32 "§32-6-64
33 (a)(1) The design of license plates, including all
34 emblems, slogans, symbols, or characters appearing on the
35 plates, shall be, by rule, as adopted by the Commissioner of
36 Revenue, and as otherwise specified by law. The face of the
37 license plate to be displayed shall be fully treated with a
38 reflective material which will increase the nighttime
39 visibility and legibility of the plate.
40 (2) Characters on the license plate which designate the
41 county of issuance shall be numeric, and all numerals on the
42 license plates shall be no smaller than two and three-fourths
43 inches in height. The following numbering scheme shall be
44 used:
45 a. Jefferson County, 1; Mobile County, 2; Montgomery
46 County, 3.
47 b. All other counties shall be ranked alphabetically
48 and assigned consecutive numbers beginning with 4 and
49 concluding with 67.
50 c. The Department of Revenue shall be responsible for
51 the numbering of distinctive license plates and shall
52 establish a system to minimize duplication of license plate
53 numbers. License plates that shall be approved for manufacture
54 under subsection (b) shall be numbered or personalized.
55 (b) The sponsoring organization of any new or reissued
56 distinctive license plate that is not of an in-state college
Page 2

distinctive license plate that is not of an in-state college
SB189 INTRODUCED
57 or in-state university as provided in subsection (b) of
58 Section 32-6-150, or the Alabama Gold Star Family license
59 plate as provided in Section 32-6-630 or a military or veteran
60 related category shall assure a minimum quantity of 250
61 registrations in order for the proposed plate to qualify for
62 production consideration by the legislative oversight
63 committee under the provisions of Section 32-6-67.
64 (1) The procedure to assure the quantity minimum for a
65 distinctive license plate shall be as follows:
66 a. The sponsoring organization shall apply to the
67 Department of Revenue for approval for the proposed
68 distinctive license plate from the legislative oversight
69 committee. A sponsoring organization shall be limited to one
70 distinctive license plate design per application. At the time
71 of application, and upon payment of the application fee
72 required in paragraph b., if applicable, the sponsoring
73 organization shall submit a design for the plate or logo for
74 the quantity class being applied for as described below:
75 1. Quantity Class 1 (250 to 999 registrations). A new
76 distinctive license plate category, or an existing distinctive
77 license plate to be reissued, in which registrations are
78 estimated to be at least 250, but less than 1,000, shall be in
79 conformity with the design approved by the legislative
80 oversight committee for license plates in this quantity class.
81 This plate shall include a space designated on the left side
82 of the license plate, not exceeding two and one-half inches in
83 width and height, in which an appropriate emblem, slogan, or
84 logo design may be applied to represent the organization for
Page 3

logo design may be applied to represent the organization for
SB189 INTRODUCED
85 whom the distinctive license plate is issued. Each proposed
86 emblem, slogan, symbol, or logo shall be subject to the
87 approval of the legislative oversight committee.
88 2. Quantity Class 2 (1,000 or greater registrations).
89 This quantity class may use the logo system described for
90 Quantity Class 1, or may use a unique design for the entire
91 plate which is approved by the legislative oversight committee
92 and meets all other design and manufacture requirements of
93 Alabama law.
94 b. Effective January 1, 2022, each sponsoring
95 organization shall submit an application fee equal to the cost
96 of producing the distinctive license plate template not to
97 exceed one hundred dollars ($100) at the time the initial
98 application is made, the funds of which shall be distributed
99 by the Comptroller to the Department of Corrections to cover
100 the costs of producing the template of the distinctive license
101 plate for the sponsoring organization. On or before October 1,
102 2021, and by each October 1 thereafter, the Department of
103 Corrections shall certify the cost of production to the
104 legislative oversight committee for the subsequent calendar
105 year.
106 c. After the legislative oversight committee approval
107 and notification to the Department of Revenue, the department
108 shall also coordinate with the Comptroller to establish
109 funding procedures for depositing and maintaining monies held
110 pending issuance of the new category of license plates.
111 d. Each person desiring to register a vehicle in the
112 new category shall make application and shall remit, as a
Page 4

new category shall make application and shall remit, as a
SB189 INTRODUCED
113 commitment to purchase, the additional fee associated with the
114 license plate category in a manner as prescribed by rule of
115 the Commissioner of Revenue. Any credit card processing fee
116 associated with the transaction shall be paid by the person
117 making the commitment to purchase the distinctive license
118 plate and shall be nonrefundable.
119 e. The Department of Revenue shall deduct from the
120 additional fee and retain a two and one-half percent
121 commission. The balance shall be forwarded to the Comptroller
122 to be retained in escrow, until such time as the revenue
123 received is equal to or greater than the minimum amount
124 required to issue license plates in that category. If, after
125 one year from the date of notification of approval by the
126 legislative oversight committee, the number of subscribers for
127 a category fails to reach 250 for Quantity Class 1, or fails
128 to reach 1,000 for Quantity Class 2, the Comptroller shall pay
129 the money in escrow to the sponsoring organization and no
130 further consideration for production of this proposed
131 distinctive plate shall be made under this application. In
132 addition, the sponsoring organization may not submit another
133 application for a distinctive license plate for a period of
134 one year from the date the commitment to purchase period
135 ended.
136 f. Upon determination by the Department of Revenue that
137 a sufficient number of applications for a plate category has
138 been received, the department shall initiate the ordering
139 processes for design and manufacture of the approved license
140 plate. At that time, the Comptroller shall pay out of the
Page 5

plate. At that time, the Comptroller shall pay out of the
SB189 INTRODUCED
141 escrow account the amounts referred to in Section 32-6-68.
142 (2) Notwithstanding any other provisions to the
143 contrary, except where specifically provided by this
144 subsection, no distinctive license plates shall be reissued
145 unless the following requirements are met:
146 a. For Quantity Class 1 distinctive license plates,
147 there shall have been issued in the prior license year a
148 minimum of 250 license plates.
149 b. For Quantity Class 2 distinctive license plates,
150 there shall have been issued in the prior license year a
151 minimum of 1,000 license plates.
152 (3) The use of distinctive license plate categories
153 shall be limited to use on passenger cars, pick-up trucks, and
154 self-propelled campers or house cars.
155 (c)(1) The Department of Corrections is directed to
156 supply all license plates and revalidation devices required
157 under this subdivision. The amounts charged by the Department
158 of Corrections for the manufacture of revalidation devices
159 shall not be less than that charged for the manufacture of
160 license plates on a per item basis.
161 (2) The Department of Corrections shall maintain an
162 accurate system of recordkeeping which shall trace and account
163 for the handling and distribution of each plate and
164 revalidation device throughout the manufacturing process until
165 the items are distributed to each county.
166 (d) After the five-year license plate has been in use
167 for a period of three years, the Department of Corrections may
168 manufacture all subsequent license plates for the remaining
Page 6

manufacture all subsequent license plates for the remaining
SB189 INTRODUCED
169 two years of thevalidity period provided under Section 32-6-62
170 from a metal of less durability and quality than the metal
171 used initially in manufacturing the five-year license plates.
172 (e)(1) The department shall provide the owner or owners
173 of a motor vehicle who register a license plate provided in
174 this subsection the ability to opt-in to authorize the release
175 of certain personal information or to opt-out to restrict the
176 release of certain personal information by the department to
177 the sponsoring organization, college, or university. The
178 license plates that shall be subject to the opt-in and opt-out
179 provisions are as follows:
180 a. A distinctive license plate issued pursuant to this
181 section.
182 b. A collegiate or university distinctive license plate
183 issued pursuant to Section 32-6-150.
184 c. Other distinctive license plates as authorized by
185 the legislative oversight committee.
186 (2) Each owner of the motor vehicle may designate his
187 or her consent through the opt-in authorization to release
188 certain personal information included within a motor vehicle
189 registration record to the sponsoring organization, college,
190 or university. The opt-in authorization shall be made at the
191 time of initial registration through the licensing official
192 for a license plate as specified in subdivision (1).
193 Subsequent opt-in authorizations shall be made directly to the
194 department. As used in this subsection, the term personal
195 information includes only the following information:
196 a. Owner name.
Page 7

a. Owner name.
SB189 INTRODUCED
197 b. Owner address.
198 c. Owner email address, if applicable.
199 (3) Each owner of the motor vehicle may restrict the
200 release of personal information included within a motor
201 vehicle registration record for a license plate as specified
202 in subdivision (1) to the sponsoring organization, college, or
203 university by selecting to opt-out. The opt-out selection
204 shall be made directly to the department.
205 (4) The subsequent opt-in authorization provided in
206 subdivision (2) and opt-out selection provided in subdivision
207 (3) shall be made in a manner as prescribed by the department.
208 (5) The sponsoring organization of the distinctive
209 license plate or each college or university for which a
210 distinctive license plate has been issued may make an annual
211 request to the department for the listing of the owner
212 authorized opt-in disclosures. The sponsoring organization in
213 receipt of the listing shall be prohibited from the resale or
214 disclosure of the information to third parties without written
215 consent from the owner to whom the information pertains.
216 (f) All proposed distinctive license plates and the
217 continued issuance of all existing distinctive license plates
218 shall be subject to the approval and oversight of the
219 legislative oversight committee under Section 32-6-67 and this
220 section, except for the following:
221 (1) In-state collegiate or in-state university category
222 license plates.
223 (2) Military or veteran related category license
224 plates.
Page 8

plates.
SB189 INTRODUCED
225 (3) Alabama Gold Star Family license plates as provided
226 in Section 32-6-630.
227 (g) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, no
228 distinctive license plate shall be issued after five
229 consecutive years in which the plate has not met the
230 requirements for reissuance provided in this section. This
231 subsection does not apply to military or veteran related
232 categories or Alabama Gold Star Family distinctive license
233 plates. The Commissioner of Revenue may require persons who
234 qualify for military and veteran related categories or Alabama
235 Gold Star Family distinctive license plates to be recertified
236 not more than every five years by providing the licensing
237 official with Form DD214 or any other documentation prescribed
238 by law or rule as evidence of qualification for the license
239 plate. In the event that Form DD214 or other qualifying
240 documentation prescribed by law or rule is unavailable, the
241 applicant shall provide the licensing official with a
242 certification of eligibility from the Department of Veterans
243 Affairs after the applicant provides that office with other
244 authoritative documentation evidencing eligibility for the
245 license plate.
246 (h) Any distinctive license plate not created pursuant
247 to this section shall be subject to the reissuance provisions
248 of this section and Section 32-6-62 unless specifically
249 exempted by law, provided the Alabama Gold Star Family
250 distinctive license plate design in effect on January 1, 2021,
251 shall not be subject to the redesign provisions of Section
252 32-6-62.
Page 9

32-6-62.
SB189 INTRODUCED
253 (i) The provisions in Act 2021-407 amending this
254 section shall not amend the distribution of the additional fee
255 associated with a distinctive license plate as provided in
256 Section 32-6-68 or as otherwise provided under Article 2 of
257 this chapter."
258 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
259 1, 2025.
Page 10